Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1411.04
Advertising; violations; penalty.

The use, employment, or publication of advertising by any licensee or motor vehicle dealer which does not comply with section 60-1411.03 is hereby declared to be an unlawful act, and any person violating such section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 14;

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 11;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 94;

Laws 1989, LB 280, § 4.